Florida, session 2026, HB957.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 197.252, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
197.252 Homestead tax deferral.—
(1) Any person who is entitled to claim a homestead tax
exemption under s. 196.031(1) on homestead property with a just
value of $1 million or less may apply to defer payment of a
portion of the combined total of the ad valorem taxes, non-ad
valorem assessments, and interest accumulated on a tax
certificate. Any applicant who is entitled to receive the
homestead tax exemption but has waived it for any reason shall
furnish a certificate of eligibility to receive the exemption.
Such certificate shall be prepared by the county property
appraiser upon request of the taxpayer.
Section 2. Subsection (4) of section 197.432, Florida
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb957-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 957 2026
Statutes, is amended to read:
197.432 Sale of tax certificates for unpaid taxes.—
(4) A tax certificate representing less than $500 $250 in
delinquent taxes on property that has been granted a homestead
exemption for the year in which the delinquent taxes were
assessed may not be sold at public auction or by electronic sale
as provided in subsection (1) but must be issued by the tax
collector to the county at the maximum rate of interest allowed.
Section 197.4725 or s. 197.502(3) may not be invoked if the
homestead exemption is granted to the person who received the
homestead exemption for the year in which the tax certificate
was issued unless any such tax certificates and accrued interest
represent an amount of $500 $250 or more.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb957-00